test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Nouns_Masc_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - критерий M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      критерий+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: крите́рий
      критерий+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: крите́рий
      критерий+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: крите́рия
      критерий+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: крите́рии
      критерий+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: крите́рию
      критерий+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: крите́рием
      критерий+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: крите́рии
      критерий+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Inan: крите́рии
      критерий+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: крите́риев
      критерий+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: крите́риях
      критерий+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: крите́риям
      критерий+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: крите́риями
  Noun - музей M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      музей+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: музе́й
      музей+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: музе́й
      музей+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: музе́я
      музей+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: музе́е
      музей+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: музе́ю
      музей+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: музе́ем
      музей+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: музе́и
      музей+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Inan: музе́и
      музей+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: музе́ев
      музей+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: музе́ях
      музей+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: музе́ям
      музей+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: музе́ями
  Noun - карандаш M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      карандаш+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: каранда́ш
      карандаш+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: каранда́ш
      карандаш+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: карандаша́
      карандаш+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: карандаше́
      карандаш+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: карандашу́
      карандаш+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: карандашо́м
      карандаш+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: карандаши́
      карандаш+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Inan: карандаши́
      карандаш+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: карандаше́й
      карандаш+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: карандаша́х
      карандаш+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: карандаша́м
      карандаш+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: карандаша́ми
  Noun - словарь M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      словарь+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: слова́рь
      словарь+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: слова́рь
      словарь+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: словаря́
      словарь+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: словаре́
      словарь+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: словарю́
      словарь+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: словарём
      словарь+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: словари́
      словарь+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Inan: словари́
      словарь+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: словаре́й
      словарь+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: словаря́х
      словарь+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: словаря́м
      словарь+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: словаря́ми
  Noun - язык M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      язык+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: язы́к
      язык+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: язы́к
      язык+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: языка́
      язык+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: языке́
      язык+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: языку́
      язык+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: языко́м
      язык+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: языки́
      язык+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Inan: языки́
      язык+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: языко́в
      язык+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: языка́х
      язык+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: языка́м
      язык+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: языка́ми
  Noun - крюк M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      крюк+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: крю́к
      крюк+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: крю́к
      крюк+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: крюка́
      крюк+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: крюке́
      крюк+N+Msc+Sg+Loc2: крюку́
      крюк+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: крюку́
      крюк+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: крюко́м
      крюк+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: крю́чья
      крюк+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Inan: крю́чья
      крюк+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: крю́чьев
      крюк+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: крю́чьях
      крюк+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: крю́чьям
      крюк+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: крю́чьями
  Noun - пол M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      пол+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: по́л
      пол+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: по́л
      пол+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: по́ла
      пол+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: по́ле
      пол+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: по́лу
      пол+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: по́лом
      пол+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: полы́
      пол+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Inan: полы́
      пол+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: поло́в
      пол+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: пола́х
      пол+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: пола́м
      пол+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: пола́ми
